Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-406
Revocation of declaration.

(1) A declarant may revoke a declaration at any time and in any manner without regard to the declarant's mental or physical condition. A revocation shall be effective upon its communication to the attending physician or other health care provider by the declarant or a witness to the revocation.

(2) The attending physician or other health care provider shall make the revocation a part of the declarant's medical record.

Laws 1992, LB 671, § 6.